src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/Pron-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
  Pronouns:
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abe: eikelletagi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegitagi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abe+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegita
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abl: eikelleltki
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegiltki
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegilt
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ade: eikellelgi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegilgi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegil
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+All: eikellelegi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegilegi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+All+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegile
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Com: eikellegagi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegigagi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Com+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegiga
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ela: eikellestki
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegistki
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegist
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ess: eikellenagi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikelleginagi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ess+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegina
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Gen: eikellegi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ill: eikellessegi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegissegi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegisse
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ine: eikelleski
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegiski
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegis
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Nom: eikeegi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Par: eikedagi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Tra: eikellekski
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegikski
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegiks
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Trm: eikellenigi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eikelleginigi
    eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Trm+Usage/NotNorm: eikellegini
    eimiski+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eimiskidki
    eimiski+Pron+Pl+Nom+Usage/NotNorm: eimiskid
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abe: eimilletagi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegitagi, eimiskitagi]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abe+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegita, eimiskita]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abl: eimilleltki
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegiltki, eimiskiltki]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegilt, eimiskilt]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade: eimillelgi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegilgi, eimiskilgi]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegil, eimiskil]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+All: eimillelegi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegilegi, eimiskilegi]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+All+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegile, eimiskile]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Com: eimillegagi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegigagi, eimiskigagi]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Com+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegiga, eimiskiga]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ela: eimillestki
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegistki, eimiskistki]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegist, eimiskist]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ess: eimillenagi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimilleginagi, eimiskinagi]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ess+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegina, eimiskina]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Gen: eimillegi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eimiskigi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Gen+Usage/NotNorm: eimiski
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ill: eimillessegi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegissegi, eimiskissegi]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegisse, eimiskisse]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ine: eimilleski
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegiski, eimiskiski]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegis, eimiskis]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Par: eimidagi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: eimiskitki
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Par+Usage/NotNorm: eimiskit
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Tra: eimillekski
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegikski, eimiskikski]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegiks, eimiskiks]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Trm: eimillenigi
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [eimilleginigi, eimiskinigi]
    eimiski+Pron+Sg+Trm+Usage/NotNorm: [eimillegini, eimiskini]
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: iseenestetagi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseenditagi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abe: iseenesteta
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abe+Usage/Rare: iseendita
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: iseenesteltki
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendiltki
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abl: iseenestelt
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: iseendilt
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: iseenestelgi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendilgi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ade: iseenestel
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: iseendil
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: iseenestelegi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendilegi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+All: iseenestele
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: iseendile
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: iseenestegagi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendigagi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Com: iseenestega
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Com+Usage/Rare: iseendiga
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: iseenestestki
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendistki
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ela: iseenestest
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: iseendist
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: iseenestenagi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendinagi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ess: iseenestena
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ess+Usage/Rare: iseendina
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: iseenestegi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendigi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Gen: iseeneste
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Usage/Rare: iseendi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: iseenesteski
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendiski
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ine: iseenestes
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: iseendis
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: iseenestekski
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendikski
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Tra: iseenesteks
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: iseendiks
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: iseenestenigi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendinigi
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Trm: iseenesteni
    iseenese+Pron+Pl+Trm+Usage/Rare: iseendini
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: iseenesetagi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendatagi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abe: iseeneseta
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abe+Usage/Rare: iseendata
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: iseeneseltki
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendaltki
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abl: iseeneselt
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/Rare: iseendalt
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: iseeneselgi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendalgi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ade: iseenesel
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/Rare: iseendal
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: iseeneselegi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendalegi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+All: iseenesele
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+All+Usage/Rare: iseendale
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: iseenesegagi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendagagi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Com: iseenesega
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Com+Usage/Rare: iseendaga
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: iseenesestki
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendastki
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ela: iseenesest
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/Rare: iseendast
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: iseenesenagi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendanagi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ess: iseenesena
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ess+Usage/Rare: iseendana
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: iseenesegi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendagi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Gen: iseenese
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Usage/Rare: iseenda
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: iseenesessegi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendassegi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ill: iseenesesse
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: iseendasse
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: iseeneseski
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendaski
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ine: iseeneses
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/Rare: iseendas
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: iseennastki
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendki
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Par: iseennast
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: iseend
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: iseenesekski
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendakski
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Tra: iseeneseks
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/Rare: iseendaks
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: iseenesenigi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: iseendanigi
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Trm: iseeneseni
    iseenese+Pron+Sg+Trm+Usage/Rare: iseendani
    ise+Pron+Pl+Abe: enesteta
    ise+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: enestetagi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: enditagi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Abe+Usage/Rare: endita
    ise+Pron+Pl+Abl: enestelt
    ise+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: enesteltki
    ise+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endiltki
    ise+Pron+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: endilt
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ade: enestel
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: enestelgi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endilgi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: endil
    ise+Pron+Pl+All: enestele
    ise+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: enestelegi
    ise+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endilegi
    ise+Pron+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: endile
    ise+Pron+Pl+Com: enestega
    ise+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: enestegagi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endigagi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Com+Usage/Rare: endiga
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ela: enestest
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: enestestki
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endistki
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: endist
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ess: enestena
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: enestenagi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endinagi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ess+Usage/Rare: endina
    ise+Pron+Pl+Gen: eneste
    ise+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: enestegi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endigi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Gen+Usage/Rare: endi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ine: enestes
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: enesteski
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endiski
    ise+Pron+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: endis
    ise+Pron+Pl+Tra: enesteks
    ise+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: enestekski
    ise+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endikski
    ise+Pron+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: endiks
    ise+Pron+Pl+Trm: enesteni
    ise+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: enestenigi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endinigi
    ise+Pron+Pl+Trm+Usage/Rare: endini
    ise+Pron+Sg+Abe: eneseta
    ise+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: enesetagi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endatagi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Abe+Usage/Rare: endata
    ise+Pron+Sg+Abl: eneselt
    ise+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: eneseltki
    ise+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endaltki
    ise+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/Rare: endalt
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ade: enesel
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: eneselgi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endalgi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/Rare: endal
    ise+Pron+Sg+All: enesele
    ise+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: eneselegi
    ise+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endalegi
    ise+Pron+Sg+All+Usage/Rare: endale
    ise+Pron+Sg+Com: enesega
    ise+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: enesegagi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endagagi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Com+Usage/Rare: endaga
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ela: enesest
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: enesestki
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endastki
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/Rare: endast
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ess: enesena
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: enesenagi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endanagi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ess+Usage/Rare: endana
    ise+Pron+Sg+Gen: enese
    ise+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: enesegi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endagi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Gen+Usage/Rare: enda
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ill: enesesse
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: enesessegi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endassegi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: endasse
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ine: eneses
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: eneseski
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endaski
    ise+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/Rare: endas
    ise+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: isegi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Nom: ise
    ise+Pron+Sg+Par: ennast
    ise+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: ennastki
    ise+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endki
    ise+Pron+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: end
    ise+Pron+Sg+Tra: eneseks
